Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2930.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 36 O.S. 2021, Section 942, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 942. Any insurance carrier that issues motor vehicle
liability or collision insurance policies in this state shall not
establish or apply premium rates, increase premium rates, cancel a
policy, or refuse to issue or renew a policy, based on any traffic
record maintained by the Department of Public Safety, including, but
not limited to, traffic complaints, traffic citations or other legal
forms of traffic charges, and accident reports, which covers a
period of time more than three (3) years prior to the date the
Req. No. 14069 Page 1

insu rance carrier makes a determination to take any such action;
provided, however, those offenses that are provided for in
subsection C of Section 941 of this title and the offense of
reckless driving as provided for in Section 11-901 of Title 47 of
the Oklahoma Statutes may be considered by an insurance carrier for
a period of not more than five (5) years.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 36 O.S. 2021, Section 943, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 943. A. No insurance carrier who issues motor vehicle
policies in this state shall use traffic complaints, traffic
citations or other legal forms of traffic charges as a basis for
cancellation of a motor vehicle insurance policy, increasing premium
rates for a motor vehicle insurance policy or refusing to issue or
renew a motor vehicle insurance policy, where:
1. the The insured was acquitted of the charge;
2. the The insured was arrested and no charges were filed; or
3. the The insured was arrested and the charges were dismissed.
B. No insurer shall cancel, refuse to renew or otherwise
terminate, or increase the premium of a motor vehicle policy which
has been in effect more than forty-five (45) days solely because the
insured filed a first claim against the policy. Nothing in this
subsection shall be construed to prevent the cancellation,
nonrenewal or other termination, or increase in premium for any of
the following reasons:
Req. No. 14069 Page 2

1. Nonpayment of premium;
2. Discovery of fraud or material misrepresentation in the
procurement of the insurance or with respect to any claims submitted
thereunder;
3. Offenses provided for in subsection C of Section 941 of this
title;
4. Offenses provided for in Section 11-901 of Title 47 of the
Oklahoma Statutes; or
5. A determination by the Insurance Commissioner that the
continuation of the policy would place the insurer in violation of
the insurance laws of this state.
C. The Insurance Commissioner may suspend or revoke, after
notice and opportunity for a hearing, the certificate of authority
to transact insurance business in this state of any insurance
carrier violating the provisions of this section or may censure the
insurer or impose a fine.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-14069 MJ 11/19/25





Req. No. 14069 Page 3